Nebraska, session 109, LB577.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB577 LB577
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-2847, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2847 (1) Verification means the confirmation by a supervising
pharmacist of the accuracy and completeness of the acts, tasks, or
functions undertaken by a pharmacy technician to assist the pharmacist in
the practice of pharmacy.
(2) Verification shall occur by a pharmacist on duty in the
facility, except that verification may occur (a) by means of a real-time
audiovisual communication system if (i) (a) a pharmacy technician
performs authorized activities or functions to assist a pharmacist and
the prescribed drugs or devices will be administered to persons who are
patients or residents of a facility by a credentialed individual
authorized to administer medications, or (ii) (b) a pharmacy technician
is engaged in remote dispensing in compliance with section 71-436.02, or
(b) when (c) all of the following conditions are met: (i) The pharmacist
performing the verification of pharmacy technician data entry is located
in a licensed pharmacy in Nebraska, (ii) the physical product
verification occurs in person at the location where the prescription is
prepared, and (iii) the pharmacy maintains manual or electronic records
that identify, individually for each order processed, the name, initials,
or identification code of each pharmacist, pharmacist intern, or pharmacy
technician who took part in all acts, tasks, or functions undertaken to
fulfill a prescription.
Sec. 2. Section 71-436.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-436.02 (1) A pharmacy shall obtain a remote dispensing pharmacy
license under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act prior to engaging in
remote dispensing. A pharmacy shall not be licensed as both a remote
dispensing pharmacy and a pharmacy. At the time of initial licensure as a
remote dispensing pharmacy, the remote dispensing pharmacy must be
located ten driving miles or more from the nearest pharmacy. The remote
-2-

LB577 LB577
2025 2025
dispensing pharmacy shall operate in accordance with this section.
(2) If the remote dispensing pharmacy employs a certified pharmacy
technician to dispense prescription drugs, remote dispensing shall occur
under remote supervision via a real-time audiovisual communication system
by a licensed pharmacist employed by a supervising pharmacy. The licensed
pharmacist must be licensed and located in Nebraska. If the real-time
audiovisual communication system between the remote dispensing pharmacy
and supervising pharmacy is not working, no remote dispensing can be
completed at the remote dispensing pharmacy until the real-time
audiovisual communication system is restored and working properly.
(3) The remote dispensing pharmacy must have the same pharmacist in
charge as the supervising pharmacy. The pharmacist in charge must ensure
that a pharmacist is onsite at the remote dispensing pharmacy at a
minimum of once each calendar month. The pharmacist in charge in the
supervising pharmacy may delegate tasks to another pharmacist who is
employed by the supervising pharmacy, such as supervision of the
certified pharmacy technician working remotely in the remote dispensing
pharmacy, oversight of inventory, patient counseling, and other duties as
assigned. The pharmacist supervising the certified pharmacy technician
remotely is responsible for the drug utilization review, the final
verification, and the supervision of the remote dispensing at the remote
dispensing pharmacy.
(4) In order for remote dispensing to occur in a remote dispensing
pharmacy:
(a) When a prescription is being dispensed to a patient or
caregiver, the supervising pharmacist must attempt to counsel on all new
prescriptions dispensed from the remote dispensing pharmacy; and
(b) The real-time audiovisual communication system must be working
properly.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-436.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 38-2847, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-3-

LB577 LB577
2025 2025
2024, are repealed.
-4-